Alaska statutes. Title 35. Public Buildings, Works, and Improvements.
Chapter 15. Construction Procedures.

Cross references. —

For nonapplicability of this chapter to memorials to Alaska veterans, see AS

44.35.030

.

Administrative Code. —

For local control of state public works projects, see 17 AAC 55.

Collateral references. —

Duty of public authority to disclose to contractor information, allegedly in its possession, affecting cost or feasibility of project. 86 ALR3d 182.